Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF407.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1025XS (3) 91 cm/ns S.F. 407 Section 1. Section 46.3, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 1 to read as follows: 2 1. The governor shall appoint five six eligible electors 3 of each judicial election district to the district judicial 4 nominating commission. 5 Sec. 2. Section 46.5, subsection 4, Code 2025, is amended 6 to read as follows: 7 4. If a vacancy occurs in the office of chairperson of the 8 state a judicial nominating commission, the members of the 9 commission shall elect a new chairperson as provided in section 10 46.6 . If a vacancy occurs in the office of chairperson of a 11 district judicial nominating commission or in the absence of 12 the chairperson, the members of the particular commission shall 13 elect a temporary chairperson from their own number. 14 Sec. 3. Section 46.6, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 15 to read as follows: 16 1. The commissioners of the state a judicial nominating 17 commission shall elect a chairperson from their own number. 18 The chairperson shall serve a two-year term that expires 19 on April 30 of even-numbered years. A commissioner may be 20 reelected for a second or third term as chairperson. If a 21 chairperson of a judicial nominating commission desires to 22 be relieved of the duties of chairperson while retaining the 23 status of commissioner, the chairperson shall notify the 24 governor and the other commissioners of the commission. At the 25 next meeting of the commission, the commissioners shall elect a 26 new chairperson for the remainder of the two-year term. 27 Sec. 4. Section 46.6, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended by 28 striking the subsection. 29